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DTC P0325/52 Knock Sensor 1 CircuitMalfunction

DTC P0330/55 Knock Sensor 2 Circuit Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Knock sensors are fitted to the cylinder block to detect engine knocking. This sensor contains a piezoelectric
element which generates a voltage when it becomes deformed, which occurs when the cylinder block vi-
brates due to knocking. If engine knocking occurs, ignition timing is retarded to suppress it.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

Nk k 1 i l t i ECU ith i d
SOpenorshort inknocksensor1circuit

P0325/52
Noknocksensor1signal toengineECUwithenginespeed

between 1800 rpm and 5200 rpm

SOpen orshort in knock sensor 1 circuit
SKnocksensor1 (looseness)P0325/52

between1,800 rpmand5,200 rpm
Knocksensor 1 (looseness)

SEngineECU

P0330/55
No knock sensor 2 signal to engine ECU with engine speed
between 1,800 rpm and 5,200 rpm

SOpenorshort inknocksensor2circuit
SKnocksensor2 (looseness)
SEngineECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:
S Read freeze framedatausinghand −held tester.Because freeze framerecords theengineconditions

when the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was runningorstopped, theenginewarmedupornot, theair −fuel ratio leanor rich,etc.at the time
of the malfunction.

S DTCP0325/52 is for theknocksensorcircuit on the frontside.
S DTCP0330/55 is for theknocksensorcircuit on the rearside.

1 CheckcontinuitybetweenterminalKNK 1,KNK2ofengineECUconnectorand
body ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Disconnect the E12 connector of engine ECU.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminal KNK1, KNK2 of engine
ECU connector and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M� orhigher

Reference: INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE
S With theengine racing (4,000 rpm)measurebetween ter-

minal KNK1, KNK2 of engine ECU and body ground.
HINT:
The correct waveform is as shown.

S Spread the timeon thehorizontalaxis,andconfirm that
periodof thewave is164 � sec.
(Normal mode vibration frequency of knock sensor:
6.1 kHz).

HINT:
If normal mode vibration frequency is not 6.1 kHz the sensor is
malfunctioning.

OK Go to step 3.

NG
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2 Check knock sensor.

NG Replace knock sensor.

OK

3 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
knock sensor (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

4 Does malfunction disappear when a good knock sensor is installed?

YES Replace knock sensor.

NO

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .


